Utah statutes.
41-22-32.   Certification of safety instructors.

(1)  The division may certify certain qualified persons as off-highway vehicle safety instructors.  An instructor certified by the division may act in behalf of the division as an agent in:

(a)  conducting off-highway vehicle safety classes and examinations; and

(b)  issuing safety certificates. 

(2)  A certified off-highway vehicle safety instructor shall:

(a)  successfully complete an off-highway vehicle safety instructor program for the type of vehicle instruction to be given through a program:

(i)  of the division; or

(ii)  recognized by the division which is conducted by an off-highway vehicle safety organization;

(b)  be at least 18 years of age and hold a valid motor vehicle operator's license;

(c)  have no convictions as defined in Subsection 41-6a-501(2) for driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs during the previous five years; and

(d)  have no convictions for a sexual offense against a minor or a violent crime against a minor.

